Illinois, session 104th, HB3264.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Credit for Illinois ABLE contributions.8    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2025 9and ending before January 1, 2031, each taxpayer who, during 10the taxable year, makes a contribution to a specified ABLE 11account under Section 16.6 of the State Treasurer Act in an 12amount matching a contribution made in the same taxable year 13by an employee of the taxpayer to that account is entitled to a 14credit against the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 15of Section 201 in an amount equal to 25% of that matching 16contribution, but not to exceed $500 per contributing employee 17per taxable year. 18    (b) Partners and shareholders of subchapter S corporations 19are entitled to a credit under this Section as provided in 20Section 251. 21    (c) The credit may not be carried back and may not reduce 22the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 23the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess   HB3264- 2 -LRB104 10927 HLH 21009 b1may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 25 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 3credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 4a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 5that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 6shall be applied first. 7    (d) A taxpayer claiming the credit under this Section must 8maintain and record any information that the Office of the 9State Treasurer or the Department may require regarding the 10matching contribution for which the credit is claimed.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.